Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1042.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2247XC (2) 91 th/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 68B.9 Lobbyist employment ââ 1 political subdivision restrictions. 2 A political subdivision shall not use moneys received from 3 the imposition of a tax to employ or compensate a lobbyist. 4 Sec. 2. Section 68B.34, Code 2025, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 68B.34 Additional penalty. 7 In addition to any penalty contained in any other provision 8 of law, a person who knowingly and intentionally violates a 9 provision of sections 68B.2A through 68B.8 68B.9 , sections 10 68B.22 through 68B.24 , or sections 68B.35 through 68B.38 11 is guilty of a serious misdemeanor and may be reprimanded, 12 suspended, or dismissed from the personâs position or otherwise 13 sanctioned. 14